District of Columbia statutes.
7-863.02

Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is:

(1)

To enhance the development of infants and toddlers with disabilities and to minimize their potential for developmental delay;

(2)

To reduce the educational costs to our society, including our schools, by minimizing the need for special education and related services after infants and toddlers with disabilities reach school age;

(3)

To minimize the likelihood for institutionalization of individuals with disabilities and maximize the potential for their independent living in society;

(4)

To enhance the capacity of families to meet the special needs of their infants and toddlers with disabilities;

(5)

To establish collaborative activities among agencies of the District of Columbia that administer programs relating to young children to maximize the quality of early intervention services; and

(6)

To enhance the capacity of city agencies and service providers to identify, evaluate, and meet the special needs of historically under-represented populations, particularly minorities and low-income and inner-city populations.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 502, 52 DCR 2331
This section is referenced in § 38-2602.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 502 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 502 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 502 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 502 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 502 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).